Utah statutes.
63B-19-301.   Authorizations to sell property.
The Legislature intends that the Division of Facilities Construction and
Management and any other state agency with title to property identified as
Emery County Tax Parcel No.1-156-6 are authorized to sell a perpetual easement
to Rocky Mountain Power that is approximately 60 feet in width on property at
Green River that was subject to cleanup of radiation contamination by the
United States Department of Energy and was acquired by the state of Utah, the
purchase of which was funded 90% by the federal government pursuant to 42
U.S.C. Sec. 7914, subject to the following:
(1)  The easement shall identify the conditions of the sale and require the
payment of $5,000 as consideration, of which 90% is to be refunded to the
federal government.
(2)  Rocky Mountain Power shall be required to comply with all applicable
environmental laws and requirements in regard to the easement.
